Utah statutes.
58-55-302.   Qualifications for licensure.
(1)  Each applicant for a license under this chapter shall:
(a)  submit an application prescribed by the division;
(b)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(c) (i)  meet the examination requirements established by rule by the
commission with the concurrence of the director, except for the
classifications of apprentice plumber and apprentice electrician for whom no
examination is required; or
(ii)  if required in Section 58-55-304, the individual qualifier must pass the
required examination if the applicant is a business entity;
(d)  if an apprentice, identify the proposed supervisor of the apprenticeship;
(e)  if an applicant for a contractor's license:
(i)  produce satisfactory evidence of financial responsibility, except for a
construction trades instructor for whom evidence of financial responsibility
is not required;
(ii)  produce satisfactory evidence of knowledge and experience in the
construction industry and knowledge of the principles of the conduct of
business as a contractor, reasonably necessary for the protection of the
public health, safety, and welfare; and
(iii)  be a licensed master electrician if an applicant for an electrical
contractor's license or a licensed master residential electrician if an
applicant for a residential electrical contractor's license;
(iv)  be a licensed master plumber if an applicant for a plumbing contractor's
license or a licensed master residential plumber if an applicant for a
residential plumbing contractor's license; or
(v)  be a licensed elevator mechanic and produce satisfactory evidence of
three years experience as an elevator mechanic if an applicant for an elevator
contractor's license; and
(f)  if an applicant for a construction trades instructor license, satisfy any
additional requirements established by rule.
(2)  After approval of an applicant for a contractor's license by the
applicable board and the division, the applicant shall file the following with
the division before the division issues the license:
(a)  proof of workers' compensation insurance which covers employees of the
applicant in accordance with applicable Utah law;
(b)  proof of public liability insurance in coverage amounts and form
established by rule except for a construction trades instructor for whom
public liability insurance is not required; and
(c)  proof of registration as required by applicable law with the:
(i)  Utah Department of Commerce;
(ii)  Division of Corporations and Commercial Code;
(iii)  Unemployment Insurance Division in the Department of Workforce
Services, for purposes of Title 35A, Chapter 4, Employment Security Act;
(iv)  State Tax Commission; and
(v)  Internal Revenue Service.
(3)  In addition to the general requirements for each applicant in Subsection
(1), applicants shall comply with the following requirements to be licensed in
the following classifications:
(a) (i)  A master plumber shall produce satisfactory evidence that the
applicant:
(A)  has been a licensed journeyman plumber for at least two years and had two
years of supervisory experience as a licensed journeyman plumber in accordance
with division rule;
(B)  has received at least an associate of applied science degree or similar
degree following the completion of a course of study approved by the division
and had one year of supervisory experience as a licensed journeyman plumber in
accordance with division rule; or
(C)  meets the qualifications determined by the division in collaboration with
the board to be equivalent to Subsection (3)(a)(i)(A) or (B).
(ii)  An individual holding a valid Utah license as a journeyman plumber,
based on at least four years of practical experience as a licensed apprentice
under the supervision of a licensed journeyman plumber and four years as a
licensed journeyman plumber, in effect immediately prior to May 5, 2008, is on
and after May 5, 2008, considered to hold a current master plumber license
under this chapter, and satisfies the requirements of this Subsection (3)(a)
for the purpose of renewal or reinstatement of that license under Section
58-55-303.
(iii)  An individual holding a valid plumbing contractor's license or
residential plumbing contractor's license, in effect immediately prior to May
5, 2008, is on or after May 5, 2008:
(A)  considered to hold a current master plumber license under this chapter if
licensed as a plumbing contractor and a journeyman plumber, and satisfies the
requirements of this Subsection (3)(a) for purposes of renewal or
reinstatement of that license under Section 58-55-303; and
(B)  considered to hold a current residential master plumber license under
this chapter if licensed as a residential plumbing contractor and a
residential journeyman plumber, and satisfies the requirements of this
Subsection (3)(a) for purposes of renewal or reinstatement of that license
under Section 58-55-303.
(b)  A master residential plumber applicant shall produce satisfactory
evidence that the applicant:
(i)  has been a licensed residential journeyman plumber for at least two years
and had two years of supervisory experience as a licensed residential
journeyman plumber in accordance with division rule; or
(ii)  meets the qualifications determined by the division in collaboration
with the board to be equivalent to Subsection (3)(b)(i).
(c)  A journeyman plumber applicant shall produce satisfactory evidence of:
(i)  successful completion of the equivalent of at least four years of full-
time training and instruction as a licensed apprentice plumber under
supervision of a licensed master plumber or journeyman plumber and in
accordance with a planned program of training approved by the division;
(ii)  at least eight years of full-time experience approved by the division in
collaboration with the Plumbers Licensing Board; or
(iii)  satisfactory evidence of meeting the qualifications determined by the
board to be equivalent to Subsection (3)(c)(i) or (c)(ii).
(d)  A residential journeyman plumber shall produce satisfactory evidence of:
(i)  completion of the equivalent of at least three years of full-time
training and instruction as a licensed apprentice plumber under the
supervision of a licensed residential master plumber, licensed residential
journeyman plumber, or licensed journeyman plumber in accordance with a
planned program of training approved by the division;
(ii)  completion of at least six years of full-time experience in a
maintenance or repair trade involving substantial plumbing work; or
(iii)  meeting the qualifications determined by the board to be equivalent to
Subsection (3)(d)(i) or (d)(ii).
(e)  The conduct of licensed apprentice plumbers and their licensed
supervisors shall be in accordance with the following:
(i)  while engaging in the trade of plumbing, a licensed apprentice plumber
shall be under the immediate supervision of a licensed master plumber,
licensed residential master plumber, licensed journeyman plumber, or a
licensed residential journeyman plumber; and
(ii)  a licensed apprentice plumber in the fourth through tenth year of
training may work without supervision for a period not to exceed eight hours
in any 24-hour period, but if the apprentice does not become a licensed
journeyman plumber or licensed residential journeyman plumber by the end of
the tenth year of apprenticeship, this nonsupervision provision no longer
applies.
(f)  A master electrician applicant shall produce satisfactory evidence that
the applicant:
(i)  is a graduate electrical engineer of an accredited college or university
approved by the division and has one year of practical electrical experience
as a licensed apprentice electrician;
(ii)  is a graduate of an electrical trade school, having received an
associate of applied sciences degree following successful completion of a
course of study approved by the division, and has two years of practical
experience as a licensed journeyman electrician;
(iii)  has four years of practical experience as a journeyman electrician; or
(iv)  meets the qualifications determined by the board to be equivalent to
Subsection (3)(f)(i), (ii), or (iii).
(g)  A master residential electrician applicant shall produce satisfactory
evidence that the applicant:
(i)  has at least two years of practical experience as a residential
journeyman electrician; or
(ii)  meets the qualifications determined by the board to be equivalent to
this practical experience.
(h)  A journeyman electrician applicant shall produce satisfactory evidence
that the applicant:
(i)  has successfully completed at least four years of full-time training and
instruction as a licensed apprentice electrician under the supervision of a
master electrician or journeyman electrician and in accordance with a planned
training program approved by the division;
(ii)  has at least eight years of full-time experience approved by the
division in collaboration with the Electricians Licensing Board; or
(iii)  meets the qualifications determined by the board to be equivalent to
Subsection (3)(h)(i) or (ii).
(i)  A residential journeyman electrician applicant shall produce satisfactory
evidence that the applicant:
(i)  has successfully completed two years of training in an electrical
training program approved by the division;
(ii)  has four years of practical experience in wiring, installing, and
repairing electrical apparatus and equipment for light, heat, and power under
the supervision of a licensed master, journeyman, residential master, or
residential journeyman electrician; or
(iii)  meets the qualifications determined by the division and applicable
board to be equivalent to Subsection (3)(i)(i) or (ii).
(j)  The conduct of licensed apprentice electricians and their licensed
supervisors shall be in accordance with the following:
(i)  A licensed apprentice electrician shall be under the immediate
supervision of a licensed master, journeyman, residential master, or
residential journeyman electrician.  An apprentice in the fourth year of
training may work without supervision for a period not to exceed eight hours
in any 24-hour period.
(ii)  A licensed master, journeyman, residential master, or residential
journeyman electrician may have under immediate supervision on a residential
project up to three licensed apprentice electricians.
(iii)  A licensed master or journeyman electrician may have under immediate
supervision on nonresidential projects only one licensed apprentice
electrician.
(k)  An alarm company applicant shall:
(i)  have a qualifying agent who is an officer, director, partner, proprietor,
or manager of the applicant who:
(A)  demonstrates 6,000 hours of experience in the alarm company business;
(B)  demonstrates 2,000 hours of experience as a manager or administrator in
the alarm company business or in a construction business; and
(C)  passes an examination component established by rule by the commission
with the concurrence of the director;
(ii)  if a corporation, provide:
(A)  the names, addresses, dates of birth, Social Security numbers, and
fingerprint cards of all corporate officers, directors, and those responsible
management personnel employed within the state or having direct responsibility
for managing operations of the applicant within the state; and
(B)  the names, addresses, dates of birth, Social Security numbers, and
fingerprint cards of all shareholders owning 5% or more of the outstanding
shares of the corporation, except this shall not be required if the stock is
publicly listed and traded;
(iii)  if a limited liability company, provide:
(A)  the names, addresses, dates of birth, Social Security numbers, and
fingerprint cards of all company officers, and those responsible management
personnel employed within the state or having direct responsibility for
managing operations of the applicant within the state; and
(B)  the names, addresses, dates of birth, Social Security numbers, and
fingerprint cards of all individuals owning 5% or more of the equity of the
company;
(iv)  if a partnership, provide the names, addresses, dates of birth, Social
Security numbers, and fingerprint cards of all general partners, and those
responsible management personnel employed within the state or having direct
responsibility for managing operations of the applicant within the state;
(v)  if a proprietorship, provide the names, addresses, dates of birth, Social
Security numbers, and fingerprint cards of the proprietor, and those
responsible management personnel employed within the state or having direct
responsibility for managing operations of the applicant within the state;
(vi)  if a trust, provide the names, addresses, dates of birth, Social
Security numbers, and fingerprint cards of the trustee, and those responsible
management personnel employed within the state or having direct responsibility
for managing operations of the applicant within the state;
(vii)  be of good moral character in that officers, directors, shareholders
described in Subsection (3)(k)(ii)(B), partners, proprietors, trustees, and
responsible management personnel have not been convicted of a felony, a
misdemeanor involving moral turpitude, or any other crime that when considered
with the duties and responsibilities of an alarm company is considered by the
board to indicate that the best interests of the public are served by granting
the applicant a license;
(viii)  document that none of the applicant's officers, directors,
shareholders described in Subsection (3)(k)(ii)(B), partners, proprietors,
trustees, and responsible management personnel have been declared by any court
of competent jurisdiction incompetent by reason of mental defect or disease
and not been restored;
(ix)  document that none of the applicant's officers, directors, shareholders
described in Subsection (3)(k)(ii)(B), partners, proprietors, and responsible
management personnel are currently suffering from habitual drunkenness or from
drug addiction or dependence;
(x)  file and maintain with the division evidence of:
(A)  comprehensive general liability insurance in form and in amounts to be
established by rule by the commission with the concurrence of the director;
(B)  workers' compensation insurance that covers employees of the applicant in
accordance with applicable Utah law; and
(C)  registration as is required by applicable law with the:
(I)  Division of Corporations and Commercial Code;
(II)  Unemployment Insurance Division in the Department of Workforce Services,
for purposes of Title 35A, Chapter 4, Employment Security Act;
(III)  State Tax Commission; and
(IV)  Internal Revenue Service; and
(xi)  meet with the division and board.
(l)  Each applicant for licensure as an alarm company agent shall:
(i)  submit an application in a form prescribed by the division accompanied by
fingerprint cards;
(ii)  pay a fee determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;
(iii)  be of good moral character in that the applicant has not been convicted
of a felony, a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude, or any other crime that
when considered with the duties and responsibilities of an alarm company agent
is considered by the board to indicate that the best interests of the public
are served by granting the applicant a license;
(iv)  not have been declared by any court of competent jurisdiction
incompetent by reason of mental defect or disease and not been restored;
(v)  not be currently suffering from habitual drunkenness or from drug
addiction or dependence; and
(vi)  meet with the division and board if requested by the division or the
board.
(m) (i)  Each applicant for licensure as an elevator mechanic shall:
(A)  provide documentation of experience and education credits of not less
than three years work experience in the elevator industry, in construction,
maintenance, or service and repair; and
(B)  satisfactorily complete a written examination administered by the
division established by rule under Section 58-1-203; or
(C)  provide certificates of completion of an apprenticeship program for
elevator mechanics, having standards substantially equal to those of this
chapter and registered with the United States Department of Labor Bureau
Apprenticeship and Training or a state apprenticeship council.
(ii) (A)  If an elevator contractor licensed under this chapter cannot find a
licensed elevator mechanic to perform the work of erecting, constructing,
installing, altering, servicing, repairing, or maintaining an elevator, the
contractor may:
(I)  notify the division of the unavailability of licensed personnel; and
(II)  request the division issue a temporary elevator mechanic license to an
individual certified by the contractor as having an acceptable combination of
documented experience and education to perform the work described in
Subsection (3)(m)(ii)(A).
(B) (I)  The division may issue a temporary elevator mechanic license to an
individual certified under Subsection (3)(m)(ii)(A)(II) upon application by
the individual, accompanied by the appropriate fee as determined by the
department under Section 63J-1-504.
(II)  The division shall specify the time period for which the license is
valid and may renew the license for an additional time period upon its
determination that a shortage of licensed elevator mechanics continues to
exist.
(4)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the division may make rules establishing when Federal Bureau of
Investigation records shall be checked for applicants as an alarm company or
alarm company agent.
(5)  To determine if an applicant meets the qualifications of Subsections
(3)(k)(vii) and (3)(l)(iii), the division shall provide an appropriate number
of copies of fingerprint cards to the Department of Public Safety with the
division's request to:
(a)  conduct a search of records of the Department of Public Safety for
criminal history information relating to each applicant for licensure as an
alarm company or alarm company agent and each applicant's officers, directors,
shareholders described in Subsection (3)(k)(ii)(B), partners, proprietors, and
responsible management personnel; and
(b)  forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation a fingerprint card of each
applicant requiring a check of records of the F.B.I. for criminal history
information under this section.
(6)  The Department of Public Safety shall send to the division:
(a)  a written record of criminal history, or certification of no criminal
history record, as contained in the records of the Department of Public Safety
in a timely manner after receipt of a fingerprint card from the division and a
request for review of Department of Public Safety records; and
(b)  the results of the F.B.I. review concerning an applicant in a timely
manner after receipt of information from the F.B.I.
(7) (a)  The division shall charge each applicant for licensure as an alarm
company or alarm company agent a fee, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504,
equal to the cost of performing the records reviews under this section.
(b)  The division shall pay the Department of Public Safety the costs of all
records reviews, and the Department of Public Safety shall pay the F.B.I. the
costs of records reviews under this section.
(8)  Information obtained by the division from the reviews of criminal history
records of the Department of Public Safety and the F.B.I. shall be used or
disseminated by the division only for the purpose of determining if an
applicant for licensure as an alarm company or alarm company agent is
qualified for licensure.
(9) (a)  An application for licensure under this chapter shall be denied if:
(i)  the applicant has had a previous license, which was issued under this
chapter, suspended or revoked within one year prior to the date of the
applicant's application;
(ii) (A)  the applicant is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability
company; and
(B)  any corporate officer, director, shareholder holding 25% or more of the
stock in the applicant, partner, member, agent acting as a qualifier, or any
person occupying a similar status, performing similar functions, or directly
or indirectly controlling the applicant has served in any similar capacity
with any person or entity which has had a previous license, which was issued
under this chapter, suspended or revoked within one year prior to the date of
the applicant's application; or
(iii) (A)  the applicant is an individual or sole proprietorship; and
(B)  any owner or agent acting as a qualifier has served in any capacity
listed in Subsection (9)(a)(ii)(B) in any entity which has had a previous
license, which was issued under this chapter, suspended or revoked within one
year prior to the date of the applicant's application.
(b)  An application for licensure under this chapter shall be reviewed by the
appropriate licensing board prior to approval if:
(i)  the applicant has had a previous license, which was issued under this
chapter, suspended or revoked more than one year prior to the date of the
applicant's application;
(ii) (A)  the applicant is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability
company; and
(B)  any corporate officer, director, shareholder holding 25% or more of the
stock in the applicant, partner, member, agent acting as a qualifier, or any
person occupying a similar status, performing similar functions, or directly
or indirectly controlling the applicant has served in any similar capacity
with any person or entity which has had a previous license, which was issued
under this chapter, suspended or revoked more than one year prior to the date
of the applicant's application; or
(iii) (A)  the applicant is an individual or sole proprietorship; and
(B)  any owner or agent acting as a qualifier has served in any capacity
listed in Subsection (9)(b)(ii)(B) in any entity which has had a previous
license, which was issued under this chapter, suspended or revoked more than
one year prior to the date of the applicant's application.
